Utah statutes.
34-23-201.   Employment of minors in hazardous occupations prohibited -- Exceptions.

A minor may not be employed or permitted to work in any hazardous occupation except as authorized by the division in writing when the minor is under careful supervision in connection with or following completion of an apprentice program, vocational training, or rehabilitation program as approved by the division.

